Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-815
Certificate; continuance in force; conversion privileges.

Any regular Nebraska certificate, including any permanent or life certificate in force on January 1, 1964, shall remain in force for its regular term. Upon application by the holder of any such certificate, the board may authorize the conversion of such certificate to a similar certificate or permit issued by the commissioner under sections 79-806 to 79-815.

Laws 1963, c. 491, § 11, p. 1572;

Laws 1971, LB 292, § 21;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 28;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1247.13;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 445;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 16.